District of Columbia statutes.
38-159

Public school enrollment census.

(a)

The State Education Office and the District of Columbia Public Schools shall hire an independent contractor to perform a census of the enrolled students in the D.C. Public Schools as well as the school employees, their job classifications, and duties.

(b)

The independent contractor shall count the number of students enrolled in the District of Columbia Public Schools. The count shall include the information specified in § 38-1804.02(b).

(c)

The independent contractor shall submit the census report to the Council, Mayor, and the Financial Authority on or before January 1, 1999, and in subsequent years as needed.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 702, 45 DCR 7193
Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-176, § 8(d), 47 DCR 6835
This section is referenced in § 38-2602.
1981 Ed., § 31-2853.42a.
D.C. Law 13-176, in subsec. (a), substituted “State Education Office” for “Board of Education”.
Section 4 of D.C. Law 13-199, repealed subsec. (b), and rewrote subsec. (a) to read as follows:
“(a) The Board of Education and the District of Columbia Public Schools shall hire an independent contractor to perform a census of the school employees of the District of Columbia Public Schools, their job classifications, and duties.”
Section 6(b) of the D.C. Law 13-199 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 4 of D.C. Law 14-38 repealed subsec. (b), and amended subsec. (a) to read as follows:
“(a) The Board of Education and the District of Columbia Public Schools shall hire an independent contractor to perform a census of the school employees of the District of Columbia Public Schools, their job classifications, and duties.”
Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 14-38 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary addition of section, see § 402 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and § 402 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669)
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of the Public School Enrollment Integrity Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-453, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9406).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of Public School Enrollment Integrity Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-86, July 9, 2001, 48 DCR 6373).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of Public School Enrollment Integrity Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-192, November 29, 2001, 48 DCR 11239).
Public School Enrollment Census Act of 1998: Section 701 of D.C. Law 12-175 provided that title VII of the act may be cited as the “Public School Enrollment Census Act of 1998.”